District of Columbia statutes.
22-3009.01

First degree sexual abuse of a minor.

Whoever, being 18 years of age or older, is in a significant relationship with a minor, and engages in a sexual act with that minor or causes that minor to engage in a sexual act shall be imprisoned for not more than 15 years and may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 208a
as added Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(b), 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(h), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(h) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $150,000”.
This section is referenced in § 23-113.